Washington statutes.
RCW 43.62.050

Student enrollment forecasts—Report.

The office of financial management shall develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts of Washington schools, including both public and private, elementary schools, junior high schools, high schools, colleges, and universities. A current report of such forecasts shall be submitted to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and the senate on or before the fifteenth day of November of each even-numbered year.

[ 1979 c 151 s 131; 1977 c 75 s 62; 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.62.050. Prior: 1959 c 171 s 1; 1957 c 229 s 1.]

NOTES:

Review of reported FTE students: RCW 28A.150.260.